Utah statutes.
26A-1-125.   Existing local health departments required to conform to statutory amendments.

Each county or municipality operating or participating in the operation of a local health department in existence as of January 1, 2002, shall, no later than June 30, 2003, amend its local ordinances, policies, or interlocal agreements relating to the organization and operation of the local health department to conform to the statutory amendments to Title 26A during the 2002 General Session.



Enacted by Chapter 249, 2002 General Session

